Florida, session 2026, SB1358.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 66 67 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 319.324, Florida 68 Statutes, is amended to read: 69 319.324âOdometer fraud prevention and detection; funding.â 70 (1)âMoneys received by the department pursuant to s. 71 319.32(1) in the amount of $1 for each original certificate of 72 title, each duplicate copy of a certificate of title, and each 73 assignment by a lienholder shall be deposited into the Highway 74 Safety Operating Trust Fund. There shall also be deposited into 75 the fund moneys received by the department pursuant to s. 76 319.323 in the amount of $5 for each expedited service performed 77 by the department for which a fee is assessed. If the expedited 78 service is performed by the tax collector, the expedited service 79 fee is retained by the tax collector, less the general revenue 80 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1). 81 Section 2.âSubsection (2) of section 320.031, Florida 82 Statutes, as amended by section 4 of chapter 2025-125, Laws of 83 Florida, is amended to read: 84 320.031âMailing or delivery of registration certificates, 85 license plates, and validation stickers.â 86 (2)âA mail service charge may be collected for each 87 registration certificate, license plate, mobile home sticker, 88 and validation sticker mailed by the department or any tax 89 collector. Each registration certificate, license plate, mobile 90 home sticker, and validation sticker shall be mailed by first 91 class mail unless otherwise requested by the applicant. The 92 amount of the mail service charge shall be the actual postage 93 required, rounded to the nearest 5 cents, plus the actual 94 handling cost or actual envelope cost, as determined by the 95 department or tax collector a 25-cent handling charge. The mail 96 service charge is in addition to the service charge provided by 97 s. 320.04. All charges collected by the department under this 98 section shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating 99 Trust Fund. 100 Section 3.âSubsection (4) of section 320.072, Florida 101 Statutes, is amended to read: 102 320.072âAdditional fee imposed on certain motor vehicle 103 registration transactions.â 104 (4)âA tax collector or other authorized agent of the 105 department shall promptly remit all moneys collected pursuant to 106 this section, less a retained service charge of 14.3 percent and 107 any refunds granted pursuant to subsection (3), to the 108 department. The department shall deposit 85.7 percent of such 109 moneys into the State Transportation Trust Fund and 14.3 percent 110 into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. Notwithstanding 111 any other law, the moneys deposited into the State 112 Transportation Trust Fund pursuant to this subsection shall be 113 used by the Department of Transportation for the following: 114 (a)âThe Florida Shared-Use Nonmotorized Trail Network 115 established in s. 339.81, $50 million. 116 (b)âThe capital funding for the New Starts Transit Program, 117 authorized by 49 U.S.C. s. 5309 and pursuant to s. 341.051, 3.4 118 percent. 119 (c)âThe Small County Outreach Program pursuant to s. 120 339.2818, 5 percent. 121 (d)âThe Florida Strategic Intermodal System pursuant to ss. 122 339.61-339.64, 20.6 percent. 123 (e)âThe Transportation Regional Incentive Program pursuant 124 to s. 339.2819, 6.9 percent. 125 (f)âAll remaining funds for any transportation purpose 126 authorized by law. 127 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 128 320.08056, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 129 320.08056âSpecialty license plates.â 130 (3)âEach request must be made annually to the department or 131 an authorized agent serving on behalf of the department, 132 accompanied by the following tax and fees: 133 (b)âA processing fee of $5, to be retained by the tax 134 collector, less the general revenue service charge set forth in 135 s. 215.20(1) deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust 136 Fund. 137 138 A request may be made any time during a registration period. If 139 a request is made for a specialty license plate to replace a 140 current valid license plate, the specialty license plate must be 141 issued with appropriate decals attached at no tax for the plate, 142 but all fees and service charges must be paid. If a request is 143 made for a specialty license plate at the beginning of the 144 registration period, the tax, together with all applicable fees 145 and service charges, must be paid. 146 Section 5.âParagraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (8) of 147 section 322.051, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 148 322.051âIdentification cards.â 149 (8) 150 (c)âThe international symbol for the deaf and hard of 151 hearing shall be exhibited on the identification card of a 152 person who is deaf or hard of hearing upon the payment of an 153 additional $1 fee, to be retained by the tax collector, for the 154 identification card and the presentation of sufficient proof 155 that the person is deaf or hard of hearing as determined by the 156 department. Until a personâs identification card is next 157 renewed, the person may have the symbol added to his or her 158 identification card upon surrender of his or her current 159 identification card, payment of a $2 fee, to be retained by the 160 tax collector, less the general revenue service charge set forth 161 in s. 215.20(1) to be deposited into the Highway Safety 162 Operating Trust Fund, and presentation of sufficient proof that 163 the person is deaf or hard of hearing as determined by the 164 department. If the applicant is not conducting any other 165 transaction affecting the identification card, a replacement 166 identification card may be issued with the symbol without 167 payment of the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(f)3.c. For purposes 168 of this paragraph, the international symbol for the deaf and 169 hard of hearing is substantially as follows: 170 171 172 173 (d)âThe department shall include symbols representing the 174 following on an identification card upon the payment of an 175 additional $1 fee, to be retained by the tax collector, by an 176 applicant who meets the requirements of subsection (1) and 177 presents his or her: 178 1.âLifetime freshwater fishing license; 179 2.âLifetime saltwater fishing license; 180 3.âLifetime hunting license; 181 4.âLifetime sportsmanâs license; or 182 5.âLifetime boater safety identification card. 183 184 A person may replace his or her identification card before its 185 expiration date with a card that includes his or her status as a 186 lifetime licensee or boater safety cardholder upon surrender of 187 his or her current identification card, payment of a $2 fee, to 188 be retained by the tax collector, less the general revenue 189 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1) to be deposited into 190 the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and presentation of the 191 personâs lifetime license or card. If the sole purpose of the 192 replacement identification card is the inclusion of the 193 applicantâs status as a lifetime licensee or cardholder, the 194 replacement identification card must be issued without payment 195 of the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(f)3.c. 196 Section 6.âParagraphs (c) and (e) of subsection (1) of 197 section 322.14, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 198 322.14âLicenses issued to drivers.â 199 (1) 200 (c)âThe international symbol for the deaf and hard of 201 hearing provided in s. 322.051(8)(c) shall be exhibited on the 202 driver license of a person who is deaf or hard of hearing upon 203 the payment of an additional $1 fee, to be retained by the tax 204 collector, less the general revenue service charge set forth in 205 s. 215.20(1), for the license and the presentation of sufficient 206 proof that the person is deaf or hard of hearing as determined 207 by the department. Until a personâs license is next renewed, the 208 person may have the symbol added to his or her license upon the 209 surrender of his or her current license, payment of a $2 fee to 210 be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and 211 presentation of sufficient proof that the person is deaf or hard 212 of hearing as determined by the department. If the applicant is 213 not conducting any other transaction affecting the driver 214 license, a replacement license may be issued with the symbol 215 without payment of the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(e). 216 (e)âThe department shall include symbols representing the 217 following on a driver license upon the payment of an additional 218 $1 fee by an applicant who meets the requirements of s. 322.08 219 and presents his or her: 220 1.âLifetime freshwater fishing license; 221 2.âLifetime saltwater fishing license; 222 3.âLifetime hunting license; 223 4.âLifetime sportsmanâs license; or 224 5.âLifetime boater safety identification card. 225 226 A person may replace his or her driver license before its 227 expiration date with a license that includes his or her status 228 as a lifetime licensee or boater safety cardholder upon 229 surrender of his or her current driver license, payment of a $2 230 fee, to be retained by the tax collector, less the general 231 revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1) to be deposited 232 into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and presentation 233 of the personâs lifetime license or identification card. If the 234 sole purpose of the replacement driver license is the inclusion 235 of the applicantâs status as a lifetime licensee or cardholder, 236 the replacement driver license must be issued without payment of 237 the fee required in s. 322.21(1)(e). 238 Section 7.âParagraph (c) of subsection (11) and subsection 239 (12) of section 322.20, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 240 322.20âRecords of the department; fees; destruction of 241 records.â 242 (11) 243 (c)âThe clerks of court and tax collectors authorized under 244 s. 322.135, may provide 3-year, 7-year, or complete driver 245 records to any person requesting such records upon payment of 246 the appropriate fees. In addition to the fees authorized under 247 paragraph (a), clerks of court and tax collectors may assess the 248 fee listed in s. 322.135(1)(c) for this service. The applicable 249 record fees listed in paragraph (a) shall be retained by the 250 processing entity, less the general revenue service charge set 251 forth in s. 215.20(1) must be remitted to the department no 252 later than 5 days after payment is received, unless a shorter 253 remittance period is required by law. 254 (12)âThe fees collected by the department under this 255 section shall be placed in the Highway Safety Operating Trust 256 Fund. 257 Section 8.âParagraphs (e), (f), and (h) of subsection (1) 258 and subsection (8) of section 322.21, Florida Statutes, are 259 amended to read: 260 322.21âLicense fees; procedure for handling and collecting 261 fees.â 262 (1)âExcept as otherwise provided herein, the fee for: 263 (e)âA replacement driver license issued pursuant to s. 264 322.17 is $25. Of this amount $7, less the general revenue 265 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1), shall be retained by 266 or remitted to the tax collector, as applicable, shall be 267 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund and $18 268 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund. Beginning July 269 1, 2015, or upon completion of the transition of driver license 270 issuance services, if the replacement driver license is issued 271 by the tax collector, the tax collector shall retain the $7 that 272 would otherwise be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating 273 Trust Fund and the remaining revenues shall be deposited into 274 the General Revenue Fund. 275 (f)âAn original, renewal, or replacement identification 276 card issued pursuant to s. 322.051 is $25. 277 1.âAn applicant who meets any of the following criteria is 278 exempt from the fee under this paragraph for an original, 279 renewal, or replacement identification card: 280 a.âThe applicant presents a valid Florida voterâs 281 registration card to the department and attests that he or she 282 is experiencing a financial hardship. 283 b.âThe applicant presents evidence satisfactory to the 284 department that he or she is homeless as defined in s. 285 414.0252(7). 286 c.âThe applicant presents evidence satisfactory to the 287 department that his or her annual income is at or below 100 288 percent of the federal poverty level. 289 d.âThe applicant is a juvenile offender who is in the 290 custody or under the supervision of the Department of Juvenile 291 Justice, who is receiving services pursuant to s. 985.461, and 292 whose identification card is issued by the departmentâs mobile 293 issuing units. 294 2.âPursuant to s. 322.051(10), an applicant who is 80 years 295 of age or older and whose driving privilege is denied due to 296 failure to pass a vision test administered pursuant to s. 297 322.18(5) is exempt from the fee under this paragraph for an 298 original identification card. 299 3.âFunds collected from fees for original, renewal, or 300 replacement identification cards shall be distributed as 301 follows: 302 a.âFor an original identification card issued pursuant to 303 s. 322.051, the fee shall be deposited into the General Revenue 304 Fund. 305 b.âFor a renewal identification card issued pursuant to s. 306 322.051, $6, less the general revenue service charge set forth 307 in s. 215.20(1), shall be retained by or remitted to the tax 308 collector, as applicable shall be deposited into the Highway 309 Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $19 shall be deposited into the 310 General Revenue Fund. 311 c.âFor a replacement identification card issued pursuant to 312 s. 322.051, $9, less the general revenue service charge set 313 forth in s. 215.20(1), shall be retained by or remitted to the 314 tax collector, as applicable shall be deposited into the Highway 315 Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $16 shall be deposited into the 316 General Revenue Fund. Beginning July 1, 2015, or upon completion 317 of the transition of the driver license issuance services, if 318 the replacement identification card is issued by the tax 319 collector, the tax collector shall retain the $9 that would 320 otherwise be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust 321 Fund and the remaining revenues shall be deposited into the 322 General Revenue Fund. 323 (h)âA hazardous-materials endorsement, as required by s. 324 322.57(1)(e), shall be set by the department by rule and must 325 reflect the cost of the required criminal history check, 326 including the cost of the state and federal fingerprint check, 327 and the cost to the department of providing and issuing the 328 license, and an additional $50, to be retained by the tax 329 collector. The fee may shall not exceed $100. This fee shall be 330 deposited in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. The 331 department may adopt rules to administer this section. 332 (8)âA person who applies for reinstatement following the 333 suspension or revocation of the personâs driver license must pay 334 a service fee of $45 following a suspension, and $75 following a 335 revocation, which is in addition to the fee for a license. A 336 person who applies for reinstatement of a commercial driver 337 license following the disqualification or downgrade of the 338 personâs privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle must 339 pay a service fee of $75, which is in addition to the fee for a 340 license. The department shall collect all of these fees at the 341 time of reinstatement. The department shall issue proper 342 receipts for such fees and shall promptly transmit all funds 343 received by it as follows: 344 (a)âOf the $45 fee received from a licensee for 345 reinstatement following a suspension: 346 1.âIf the reinstatement is processed by the department, the 347 department shall deposit $15 in the General Revenue Fund and $30 348 in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 349 2.âIf the reinstatement is processed by the tax collector, 350 $30 $15, less the general revenue service charge set forth in s. 351 215.20(1), shall be retained by the tax collector, $15 shall be 352 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $15 353 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund. 354 (b)âOf the $75 fee received from a licensee for 355 reinstatement following a revocation, disqualification, or 356 downgrade: 357 1.âIf the reinstatement is processed by the department, the 358 department shall deposit $35 in the General Revenue Fund and $40 359 in the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 360 2.âIf the reinstatement is processed by the tax collector, 361 $40 $20, less the general revenue service charge set forth in s. 362 215.20(1), shall be retained by the tax collector, $20 shall be 363 deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund, and $35 364 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund. 365 366 If the revocation or suspension of the driver license was for a 367 violation of s. 316.193, or for refusal to submit to a lawful 368 breath, blood, or urine test, an additional fee of $130 must be 369 charged. However, only one $130 fee may be collected from one 370 person convicted of violations arising out of the same incident. 371 The department shall collect and remit the $130 fee, less the 372 general revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1), to the 373 tax collector and deposit the fee into the Highway Safety 374 Operating Trust Fund at the time of reinstatement of the 375 personâs driver license, but the fee may not be collected if the 376 suspension or revocation is overturned. If the revocation or 377 suspension of the driver license was for a conviction for a 378 violation of s. 817.234(8) or (9) or s. 817.505, an additional 379 fee of $180 is imposed for each offense. The department shall 380 collect and remit the additional fee, less the general revenue 381 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1), to the tax collector 382 deposit the additional fee into the Highway Safety Operating 383 Trust Fund at the time of reinstatement of the personâs driver 384 license. 385 Section 9.âSubsection (2) of section 322.29, Florida 386 Statutes, is amended to read: 387 322.29âSurrender and return of license.â 388 (2)âNotwithstanding subsection (1), an examination is not 389 required for the return of a license suspended under s. 318.15 390 or s. 322.245 unless an examination is otherwise required by 391 this chapter. A person applying for the return of a license 392 suspended under s. 318.15 or s. 322.245 must present to the 393 department certification from the court that he or she has 394 complied with all obligations and penalties imposed pursuant to 395 s. 318.15 or, in the case of a suspension pursuant to s. 396 322.245, that he or she has complied with all directives of the 397 court and the requirements of s. 322.245 and shall pay to the 398 department a nonrefundable service fee of $60, of which $37.50 399 shall be deposited into the General Revenue Fund and $22.50 400 shall be deposited into the Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund. 401 If reinstated by the clerk of the court or tax collector, the 402 service fee shall be retained by the processing entity $37.50 403 shall be retained and $22.50 shall be remitted to the Department 404 of Revenue for deposit into the Highway Safety Operating Trust 405 Fund. However, the service fee is not required if the person is 406 required to pay a $45 fee or $75 fee under s. 322.21(8). 407 Section 10.âSubsection (3) of section 324.0221, Florida 408 Statutes, is amended to read: 409 324.0221âReports by insurers to the department; suspension 410 of driver license and vehicle registrations; reinstatement.â 411 (3)âAn operator or owner whose driver license or 412 registration has been suspended under this section or s. 316.646 413 may affect its reinstatement upon compliance with the 414 requirements of this section and upon payment to the department 415 of a nonrefundable reinstatement fee of $150 for the first 416 reinstatement. The reinstatement fee is $250 for the second 417 reinstatement and $500 for each subsequent reinstatement during 418 the 3 years following the first reinstatement. A person 419 reinstating her or his insurance under this subsection must also 420 secure coverage as described in ss. 324.021(8), 324.023, and 421 627.7275(2) and present to the appropriate person proof that the 422 coverage is in force on a form adopted by the department, and 423 such proof shall be maintained for 2 years. If the person does 424 not have a second reinstatement within 3 years after her or his 425 initial reinstatement, the reinstatement fee is $150 for the 426 first reinstatement after that 3-year period. If a personâs 427 license and registration are suspended under this section or s. 428 316.646, only one reinstatement fee must be paid to reinstate 429 the license and the registration. All fees shall be collected by 430 the department or tax collector at the time of reinstatement. 431 The department or tax collector shall issue proper receipts for 432 such fees and shall, if the service is provided by the 433 department, promptly deposit the those fees in the Highway 434 Safety Operating Trust Fund or, if the service is provided by 435 the tax collector, retain the fees less the general revenue 436 service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1). One-third of the fees 437 collected under this subsection shall be distributed from the 438 Highway Safety Operating Trust Fund or tax collector, as 439 applicable, to the local governmental entity or state agency 440 that employed the law enforcement officer seizing the license 441 plate pursuant to s. 324.201. The funds may be used by the local 442 governmental entity or state agency for any authorized purpose. 443 Section 11.âSection 324.071, Florida Statutes, is amended 444 to read: 445 324.071âReinstatement; renewal of license; reinstatement 446 fee.âAny operator or owner whose license or registration has 447 been suspended pursuant to s. 324.051(2), s. 324.072, s. 448 324.081, or s. 324.121 may effect its reinstatement upon 449 compliance with the provisions of s. 324.051(2)(a)3. or 4., or 450 s. 324.081(2) and (3), as the case may be, and with one of the 451 provisions of s. 324.031 and upon payment to the department or 452 tax collector of a nonrefundable reinstatement fee of $15. This 453 fee shall be retained by the processing entity, less the general 454 revenue service charge set forth in s. 215.20(1). Only one such 455 fee shall be paid by any one person irrespective of the number 456 of licenses and registrations to be then reinstated or issued to 457 such person. All such fees shall be deposited to a department 458 trust fund. When the reinstatement of any license or 459 registration is effected by compliance with s. 324.051(2)(a)3. 460 or 4., the department shall not renew the license or 461 registration within a period of 3 years from such reinstatement, 462 nor shall any other license or registration be issued in the 463 name of such person, unless the operator is continuing to comply 464 with one of the provisions of s. 324.031. 465 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.